Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.540

Waiver of tuition and fees for residents sixty years of age or older—Limitations.

Consistent with the regulations and procedures established by the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College and the state board for community and technical colleges, each institution may for Washington residents who are sixty years of age or older:

(1) Waive, in whole or in part, the tuition and services and activities fees for students who qualify under this section and who are enrolled for credit, and

(2) Waive, in whole or in part, the tuition and services and activities fees for students who qualify under this section, but charge a nominal fee not to exceed five dollars per quarter, or semester, as the case may be, for such students who are enrolled on an audit basis: PROVIDED, That residents enrolling with fee exemptions under this section shall register for not more than two quarter or semester courses at one time on a space available basis, and no new course sections shall be created as a direct result of such registration: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such waivers shall not be available to students who plan to use the course credits gained thereby for increasing credentials or salary schedule increases: PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollment information concerning fee exemptions awarded under this section shall be maintained separately from other enrollment information but shall not be included in official enrollment reports: PROVIDED, That persons who enroll pursuant to provisions of this section shall not be considered for any purpose in determining student-teacher ratio, nor for any purpose relating to enrollment totals, nor any other statistic which would affect budgetary determinations. Persons enrolling under the provisions of this section shall have, in equal with all other students, access to course counseling services and shall be subject to all course prerequisite requirements.

[ 1992 c 231 s 16; 1985 c 390 s 29; 1975 1st ex.s. c 157 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Purpose—1975 1st ex.s. c 157: "In recognition of the worthwhile goal of making education a lifelong process, it is the declared desire of the legislature to promote the availability of postsecondary education for the state's older residents." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 157 s 1.]